Massachusetts, session 194th, H1392.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Chapter 118E of the general laws is hereby amended by adding at the end
thereof the following new section:
Section 83. The vaccine administration reimbursement rates for all providers
administering all immunizations for Medicaid eligible adults and children shall be no less than
the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services (CMS) regional reimbursement rate. This shall
include billing through any Massachusetts Medicaid immunization payment providers or
pharmacy benefit manager.
Section 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
of 1